dev/translit/mar.lexc
LEXICON Root
AllCons ;
Vowels ;
Punct ;
Num ;

LEXICON AllCons
Aspable ;
Cons ;
Asp ; 
FinalY ;

LEXICON NonAspCons
Aspable ;
Cons ;
FinalY ;

LEXICON Aspable
m:म		PostAsp ;
n:न		PostAsp ;
v:व		PostAsp ;
w:व	 	PostAsp ;

LEXICON Cons
b:ब		PostCons ;
bh:भ	PostCons ;
c:क 	PostCons ;
ck:क 	PostCons ;
ch:च	PostCons ;
chh:छ	PostCons ;
d:द		PostCons ;
d:ड		PostCons ;
dh:ध	PostCons ;
dh:ढ		PostCons ;
f:फ		PostCons ;
g:ग		PostCons ;
gh:घ	PostCons ;
j:ज		PostCons ;
jh:झ	PostCons ;
k:क		PostCons ;
kh:ख	PostCons ;
l:ल		PostCons ;
l:ळ		PostCons ;
n:ण 	PostCons ;
p:प		PostCons ;
ph:फ	PostCons ;
q:क		PostCons ;
r:र		PostCons ;
r:ऱ् 	NonAspCons ;	
s:स		PostCons ;
sh:श	PostCons ;
sh:ष		PostCons ;
t:त		PostCons ;
t:ट		PostCons ;
th:थ	PostCons ;
th:ठ		PostCons ;
y:य		PostCons ;
z:ज		PostCons ;
z:झ 	PostCons ;
zh:झ	PostCons ;
ksh:क््ष PostCons ;
dny:ज्ञ PostCons ;
toy:त+आहे End ;
tiye:त+आहे End ;
tay:त+आहे End ;
loy:लो+आहे End ;
lay:ले+आहे End ;
lay:ला+आहे End ;
liye:ली+आहे End ;

LEXICON Asp
h:ह 		PostConsNoJoin ;

LEXICON FinalY
ya:य 	End ;	

LEXICON AllNasal
n:ं 	Root ;
End ;
Root ;

LEXICON Vowels
a:अ 	AllNasal ;
a:आ		AllNasal ;
aa:आ	AllNasal ;
i:इ		AllNasal ;
i:ई		AllNasal ;
ee:ई		AllNasal ;
u:उ		AllNasal ;
u:ऊ		AllNasal ;
oo:ऊ	AllNasal ;
e:ए		AllNasal ;
ai:ऐ		AllNasal ;
o:ओ		AllNasal ;
au:औ	AllNasal ;
aha:अः	AllNasal ;

LEXICON Matra
a:		AllCons ;
aa:ा 	AllCons ;
a:ा 	PostVow ;
i:ि 	PostVow ;
i:ी 	PostVow ;
ee:ी	PostVow ;
u:ु		PostVow ;
u:ू		PostVow ;
oo:ू 	PostVow ;
e:े		PostVow ;
ai:ै	PostVow ;
o:ो		PostVow ;
au:ौ	PostVow ;
an:ं	PostVow ;
a:ं 	End ;
a:0		End ;
an:ां  PostVow ;
aha:ः	PostVow ;

LEXICON PostCons
:्		NonAspCons ;
:		Matra ;
:		End ;
ru:ृ	AllCons ;
ri:ृ	AllCons ;

LEXICON PostConsNoJoin
r:्र 	AllCons ;
y:्य 	Matra ;
ru:ृ	AllCons ;
ri:ृ	AllCons ;
:		AllCons ;
:		Matra ;
: 		End ;

LEXICON PostAsp
:् 		Asp ;
: 		PostCons ;

LEXICON Temp
AllCons ;
Vowels ;

LEXICON PostVow
:		AllCons ;
:		Vowels ;
:		End ;

LEXICON Punct
.:.		Root ;
,:,		Root ;

LEXICON Num 
%0:०	End ;
1:१ 	End ;
2:२ 	End ;
3:३ 	End ;
4:४ 	End ;
5:५ 	End ;
6:६ 	End ;
7:७ 	End ;
8:८ 	End ;
9:९ 	End ;
%0:०	Root ;
1:१ 	Root ;
2:२ 	Root ;
3:३ 	Root ;
4:४ 	Root ;
5:५ 	Root ;
6:६ 	Root ;
7:७ 	Root ;
8:८ 	Root ;
9:९ 	Root ;


LEXICON End
: # ;
